Arkansas, session 2025, SB454.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 18-28-213(b), concerning the deposit of
unclaimed property funds, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) At the end of each fiscal year, the administrator shall
withdraw from the Unclaimed Property Proceeds Interest Trust Fund an amount
necessary to reimburse the State Central Services Fund, or its successor fund
or fund account, for moneys expended for personal services and operating
expenses of administering and enforcing this subchapter.
(2) If there are insufficient funds available in the Unclaimed
Property Interest Trust Fund to reimburse the State Central Services Fund, or
its successor fund or fund account, in a fiscal year as required under
subdivision (b)(1) of this section, the administrator shall withdraw the
*JLL265*
03/13/2025 10:14:30 AM JLL265

SB454
remaining amount owed to the State Central Services Fund, or its successor
fund or fund account, under this subsection from the Unclaimed Property
Proceeds Trust Fund.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 18-28-213(c)(2), concerning the deposit of
unclaimed property funds is amended to read as follows:
(2) At least one (1) time each fiscal year, the administrator
shall transfer to the general revenues of the state eighteen million dollars
($18,000,000) from the remaining funds that have been collected and held for
a full three (3) years, less the amount transferred to the State Central
Services Fund, or its successor fund or fund account, under subsection (b) of
this section as required by this subchapter.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 19-3-603(4), concerning the entities that
may deposit money into the State Treasury Money Management Trust for the
purpose of investment, is amended to read as follows:
(4)(A) The Auditor of State may invest funds subject to the
unclaimed property provisions of the Unclaimed Property Act, § 18-28-201 et
seq., in the State Treasury Money Management Trust.
(B) Any interest received under § 19-3-604 from the
investment of funds under this subdivision (4) shall be deposited into the
Unclaimed Property Interest Trust Fund.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code Title 19, Chapter 5, Subchapter 11, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
19-5-1161. Unclaimed Property Interest Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Unclaimed Property Interest Trust Fund”.
(b) The Unclaimed Property Interest Trust Fund shall consist of:
(1) Interest earned from the investment of funds in the
Unclaimed Property Proceeds Trust Fund and the Abandoned Mineral Proceeds
Trust Fund under § 19-3-603(4);
(2) Any remaining fund balances carried forward from year to
year; and
(3) Any other funds authorized or provided by law.
03/13/2025 10:14:30 AM JLL265

SB454
(c) The Unclaimed Property Interest Trust Fund shall be used by the
Auditor of State as follows, in order of priority as the amount in the
Unclaimed Property Interest Trust Fund permits:
(1) First, the amount necessary to reimburse the State Central
Services Fund, or its successor fund or fund account, under § 18-28-213(b)
shall be transferred to the State Central Services Fund, or its successor
fund or fund account; and
(2) Second, the amount necessary to reimburse the Unclaimed
Property Proceeds Trust Fund for any liabilities incurred during previous
fiscal years in which the amount in the Unclaimed Property Interest Trust
Fund was insufficient to reimburse the State Central Services Fund, or its
successor fund or fund account, under subdivision (c)(1) of this section
shall be transferred to the Unclaimed Property Proceeds Trust Fund.
(d) Moneys remaining in the Unclaimed Property Interest Trust Fund at
the end of each fiscal year shall carry forward and be made available for the
purposes stated in this section in the next fiscal year.
(e) The Auditor of State shall maintain accounting and other records
necessary to ensure compliance with this section and shall provide any
records maintained under this section to Arkansas Legislative Audit upon
request.

SECTION 5. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Unclaimed Property
Proceeds Trust Fund is used to reimburse the State Central Services Fund each
fiscal year for the operations and personnel costs incurred in administering
the unclaimed property program; that the transfer of funds from the Unclaimed
Property Proceeds Trust Fund to the State Central Services Fund creates a
liability that flows from the State Central Services Fund to the Unclaimed
Property Proceeds Trust Fund; that this bill would halt the growing liability
by segregating the privately owned principal in the Unclaimed Property
Proceeds Trust Fund from the state-owned interest derived from the investment
of the funds in the Unclaimed Property Proceeds Trust Fund; and that this act
is necessary because this act will enable the new Unclaimed Property Interest
Trust Fund to build a balance in anticipation of the required reimbursement
to the State Central Services Fund, which will reduce the unfunded liability
created under current law. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and
03/13/2025 10:14:30 AM JLL265

SB454
this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health,
and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2025.


































03/13/2025 10:14:30 AM JLL265